Maryland, session 2026, HB1493.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–811.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “DISPLACEMENT” MEANS THE PROVISION OF
STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES BY THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF
EDUCATION IN A MANNER THAT PRECLUDES A COMPANY THAT HAS BEEN
PROVIDING THE SERVICES FROM CONTINUING TO PROVIDE THE SERVICES.
(2) “DISPLACEMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE CIRCUMSTANCES IN
WHICH:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1493*

HOUSE BILL 1493
(I) THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION DOES NOT
RENEW A CONTRACT FOR STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES FOR CAUSE;
OR
(II) THE COMPANY THAT HAS BEEN PROVIDING THE STUDENT
BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES:
1. HAS BEEN FOUND TO HAVE ACTED IN A MANNER
THREATENING TO PUBLIC HEALTH OR SAFETY;
2. HAS BEEN FOUND TO HAVE COMMITTED A MATERIAL
BREACH OF A CONTRACT FOR STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES; OR
3. REFUSES TO CONTINUE TO PROVIDE STUDENT BUS
TRANSPORTATION SERVICES UNDER THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF AN EXISTING
AGREEMENT.
(B) BEFORE TAKING ANY ACTION THAT RESULTS IN THE DISPLACEMENT OF
A COMPANY THAT HAS BEEN PROVIDING STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES
IN CHARLES COUNTY, THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE INTENT TO DISPLACE, SENT BY
FIRST–CLASS MAIL AT LEAST 45 DAYS BEFORE THE HEARING REQUIRED UNDER
ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, TO EACH COMPANY THAT PROVIDES THE SERVICES
IN CHARLES COUNTY; AND
(2) (I) CONDUCT A PUBLIC HEARING; AND
(II) PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE HEARING TO THE PUBLIC BY
PUBLISHING A NOTIFICATION IN A NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION IN THE
COUNTY ONCE EACH WEEK FOR 2 SUCCESSIVE WEEKS BEFORE THE HEARING.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, WITHIN 1
YEAR AFTER THE PUBLIC HEARING, AND AT LEAST 2 YEARS BEFORE ANY
DISPLACEMENT, THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL PROVIDE
WRITTEN NOTICE BY REGISTERED MAIL OF THE DISPLACEMENT TO THE COMPANY
PROVIDING THE STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES.
(2) THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION MAY BEGIN
PROVIDING STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES OR CONTRACT WITH
ANOTHER COMPANY TO PROVIDE THE SERVICES LESS THAN 2 YEARS AFTER
PROVIDING THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF:

HOUSE BILL 1493 3
(I) THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION PAYS THE
DISPLACED COMPANY THAT HAS BEEN PROVIDING THE SERVICES AN AMOUNT
EQUAL TO THE COMPANY’S GROSS RECEIPTS FOR PROVIDING THE SERVICES IN THE
COUNTY FOR THE PRECEDING 24–MONTH PERIOD;
(II) THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION AND THE
COMPANY THAT HAS BEEN PROVIDING THE SERVICES AGREE TO A DIFFERENT
NOTICE PERIOD OR COMPENSATION AMOUNT; OR
(III) THE COMPANY STOPS PROVIDING THE SERVICES IN THE
COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.